Washington statutes.
RCW 20.01.200

Denial, suspension, revocation of licenses, probationary orders—Appellate review.

Appellate review of the judgment of the superior court may be sought as provided in other civil cases.

[ 1988 c 202 s 24; 1971 c 81 s 66; 1959 c 139 s 20.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.